Texas, session 891, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  FLOOD SAFETY REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN YOUTH CAMPS. (a) This section applies only to a youth camp located near a river, creek, or stream. (b)  A youth camp operator of a youth camp to which this section applies shall for each camp cabin used as an overnight accommodation for campers: (1)  equip the cabin with emergency equipment, including: (A)  radio devices capable of cabin-to-cabin communication; (B)  reflective life jackets suitable for the age of each camper staying in the cabin in a number equal to: (i)  the maximum occupancy of the cabin; or (ii)  the total number of campers assigned to the cabin, provided the camp distributes a life jacket to each camper at the time of the camper's arrival at camp; (C)  a first aid kit; and (D)  an emergency hammer tool suitable for breaking a window; (2)  safely store in the cabin in a location easily accessible to campers and other cabin occupants the emergency equipment described by Subdivision (1); and (3)  conspicuously post in the cabin easily understandable instructions for using the emergency equipment described by Subdivision (1). (c)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.